Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.150

Funding or refunding bonds—Terms of bonds.

(1) Such funding or refunding bonds, together with the interest thereon, issued against the special fund shall be a valid claim of the owner thereof only as against such fund, and the amount of the revenue of the utility pledged thereto, and shall not constitute an indebtedness of the city or town within the meaning of constitutional or statutory provisions and limitations. They shall be sold in such manner as the corporate authorities shall deem for the best interest of the municipality. The effective rate of interest on the bonds shall not exceed the effective rate of interest on warrants or bonds to be funded or refunded thereby. Interest on the bonds shall be paid semiannually. The bonds shall be executed in such manner and payable at such time and place as the legislative authority shall by ordinance determine. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a city or town from funding or refunding any of its indebtedness in any other manner provided by law. Such bonds may be of any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 69; 1965 c 7 s 35.92.150. Prior: 1935 c 81 s 4, part; RRS s 9492-4, part. Formerly RCW 80.40.150.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.